Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2565.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1298HW (3) 91 as/js H.F. 2565 DIVISION I 1 FORMATION AND AUTHORITY OF IOWA HUMAN TRAFFICKING TASK FORCE 2 Section 1. Section 80.45, Code 2026, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 80.45 Office to combat human trafficking Formation and 5 authority of Iowa human trafficking task force . 6 1. An office A task force to combat human trafficking is 7 established within the department. The purpose of the office 8 task force is to oversee and coordinate efforts to combat human 9 trafficking in this state. The task force shall be known 10 as the Iowa human trafficking task force. The Iowa human 11 trafficking task force shall have the full authority to make 12 arrests, call on other law enforcement entities within Iowa 13 to assist with arrests and investigations and to provide any 14 back-up or necessary support that the task force requires in 15 the execution of its duties as prescribed by law. The task 16 force shall also have an office and call center that is staffed 17 by personnel assigned to it twenty-four hours per day, seven 18 days per week, including during holidays. 19 2. The commissioner shall appoint a coordinator to staff 20 the office director of the Iowa human trafficking task force . 21 Additional staff may be hired, subject to the availability 22 of funding The Iowa human trafficking task force shall have 23 four teams that are divided geographically into four quadrants 24 where interstates 35 and 80 shall be the boundaries . The Iowa 25 human trafficking task force shall have all of the following 26 personnel: 27 a. A deputy director who shall be a certified law 28 enforcement officer with the state of Iowa and who shall have 29 specialized training in human trafficking. 30 b. One person to act as an intelligence and evidence officer 31 or investigator who shall have specialized training in human 32 trafficking, white collar crimes, and intelligence gathering 33 and analysis. 34 c. One person to oversee and conduct cybercrimes 35 -1- LSB 1298HW (3) 91 as/js 1/ 7 H.F. 2565 investigations, information technology forensics, and oversight 1 of the task forceâs cybercrimes operations, investigations, and 2 intelligence gathering. 3 d. Eight total investigators, two to be placed in each 4 quadrant who shall be certified law enforcement officers with 5 the state of Iowa and who shall have specialized training in 6 human trafficking. 7 e. Four victim advocates, one to be placed in each quadrant, 8 who shall have specialized training for human trafficking 9 victims. 10 f. Four emergency dispatchers who shall have specialized 11 training in human trafficking to staff the office and call 12 center. 13 3. The office Iowa human trafficking task force shall do all 14 of have the following duties and authority : 15 a. Serve as a the primary point of contact for reporting, 16 investigating, and any other activities to combat associated 17 with human trafficking in this state. 18 b. Consult with , oversee, and work jointly with other 19 governmental agencies and nongovernmental or community 20 organizations that have expertise in the areas of human 21 trafficking prevention, victim protection and assistance, law 22 enforcement, and prosecution for the purpose of combatting 23 human trafficking in this state. 24 c. Develop , implement, and maintain a strategy to 25 collect and maintain criminal history data and investigative 26 intelligence on incidents related to human trafficking. 27 d. Develop a strategy policy and standard operating 28 procedure for sharing victim and offender data among 29 governmental agencies that prioritizes the safety and security 30 of the human trafficking victims . 31 e. Apply , for or assist other governmental agencies , as 32 assistance is needed , to apply , for grants to support human 33 trafficking enforcement, prosecutions, trainings, and victim 34 services. 35 -2- LSB 1298HW (3) 91 as/js 2/ 7 H.F. 2565 f. Research and recommend trainings training and education 1 to assist governmental agencies to identify and respond 2 appropriately to human trafficking victims. 3 g. Take other steps necessary to advance the purposes of the 4 office task force . 5 h. By November 1, 2017, and annually thereafter, submit a 6 written report to the general assembly regarding the officeâs 7 task forceâs activities related to combatting human trafficking 8 and occurrences of human trafficking within this state. 9 i. Investigate human trafficking reports and make arrests 10 when appropriate. 11 j. Oversee statewide training for human trafficking. 12 k. Possess the authority and ability to call on any law 13 enforcement agency within Iowa to assist or support any 14 investigation, call, or report as the investigator deems 15 necessary, including for the arrest, pursuit, and transporting 16 of persons. 17 l. Use the state auditorâs staff that performs auditing and 18 investigations to utilize their expertise when attempting to 19 determine other facts and details. That collaboration is not 20 subject to public disclosure pursuant to section 22.2. 21 4. For purposes of this section , âhuman traffickingâ means 22 the same as defined in section 710A.1 . 23 DIVISION II 24 FORMATION AND AUTHORITY OF SPECIAL OFFICE TO PROSECUTE CRIMES 25 RELATED TO HUMAN TRAFFICKING 26 Sec. 2. Section 13.4, Code 2026, is amended to read as 27 follows: 28 13.4 Assistant and deputy attorneys general. 29 1. The attorney general may appoint a chief deputy attorney 30 general and such other deputy and assistant attorneys general 31 as may be authorized by law, who shall devote their entire time 32 to the duties of their positions. The deputy and assistant 33 attorneys general shall, subject to the direction of the 34 attorney general, have the same power and authority as the 35 -3- LSB 1298HW (3) 91 as/js 3/ 7 H.F. 2565 attorney general. 1 2. The attorney general shall add a new division to the 2 office of attorney general that shall be known as the Iowa 3 human trafficking task force special prosecution team. The 4 special prosecution team shall have the power to prosecute 5 crimes and actions in the courts on behalf of the Iowa human 6 trafficking task force defined in section 80.45. The attorney 7 general will have the full vested authority of oversight and 8 direction of the assistant attorneys general including the 9 provision of funding for support and professional staff to 10 support the divisionâs functions. 11 3. The auditor of state shall appoint four assistant 12 attorneys general for the sole purpose of prosecuting crimes 13 that are related to human trafficking and the subject of 14 investigation and arrest of the Iowa human trafficking task 15 force defined in section 80.45. One assistant attorney general 16 must represent each quadrant of the state described in section 17 80.45, subsection 2. 18 Sec. 3. Section 331.756, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 19 to read as follows: 20 2. Appear for the state and the county in all cases and 21 proceedings in the courts of the county to which the state or 22 the county is a party, except actions or proceedings resulting 23 from a change of venue from another county or actions or 24 proceedings resulting from the investigation of the Iowa human 25 trafficking task force as defined in section 80.45 , and to also 26 appear in the appellate courts in all cases in which the county 27 is a party, and appear in all actions or proceedings which that 28 are transferred on a change of venue to another county or which 29 that require the impaneling of a jury from another county and 30 in which the county or the state is a party. 31